csv2yaml/yaml_output/VTA_aw.yaml
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaadogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaanaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3PlProx: mikawaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaasiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaasiig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaasiwaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiiwag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaa'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaanaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3PlProx: mikawaawag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagosiinaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaasiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaasiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omikaagosiiwaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaasiwaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaasiwaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawaasiibaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3PlProx: omikaagonaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3PlProx: nimikawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3PlProx: gimikawaawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3PlProx: gimikawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaabane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3PlProx: omikaagowaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3PlProx: nimikawaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3PlProx: gimikawaanaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3PlProx: mikawaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimikawimaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omikawaasiwaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omikawaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgObv: mikawimaasiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgObv: nimikawimaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgObv: gimikawimaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgObv: gimikawimaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+3SgObv: omikawaawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+3SgObv: omikawaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgObv: nimikawimaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgObv: gimikawimaanaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgObv: mikawimaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimikawimaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omikawaasiwaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgObv: mikawimaasiiwan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgObv: nimikawimaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgObv: gimikawimaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgObv: gimikawimaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+3SgObv: omikawaawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+3SgObv: omikawaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgObv: nimikawimaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgObv: gimikawimaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgObv: mikawimaawan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimikawimaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiwaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omikawaasiwaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omikawaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimikawimaasiwaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimikawimaasiwaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgObv: mikawimaasiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgObv: nimikawimaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgObv: gimikawimaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgObv: gimikawimaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+3SgObv: omikawaawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+3SgObv: omikawaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgObv: nimikawimaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgObv: gimikawimaanaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgObv: mikawimaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiinini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiinini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagonini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagonini
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagosiininaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgObv/3PlObv: omikaagoninaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaasiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaasiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiidogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiidogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaasiwaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiidog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagonaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagodogena'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv+3SgProx: omikaagodogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaanaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+3SgProx: mikawaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagosiinan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagosii'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagonan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagoo'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv+3SgProx: omikaagoon
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaanaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+3SgProx: mikawaa
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaasiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaasiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiibane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omikaagosiibanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaasiwaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaasiwaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawaasiiban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+3SgProx: omikaagonaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+3SgProx: omikaagonaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg+3SgProx: nimikawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+3SgProx: gimikawaawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+3SgProx: gimikawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv+3SgProx: omikaagobane'
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv+3SgProx: omikaagobanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl+3SgProx: nimikawaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl+3SgProx: gimikawaanaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+X+3SgProx: mikawaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimikawisiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimikawisiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Dub+X+Excl: nimikaagoosiiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagominaadogenan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl+Excl: gimikawiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg+Excl: gimikawiminaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagonaadogenag
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagonaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Dub+X+Excl: nimikaagoominaadog
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimikawisiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimikawisiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Neu+X+Excl: nimikaagoosiimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl+Excl: gimikawimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg+Excl: gimikawimin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagonaanig
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagonaan
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Neu+X+Excl: nimikaagoomin
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimikawisiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimikawisiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagonaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Neg+Prt+X+Excl: nimikaagoosiiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Pl+Excl: nimikaagominaabanen
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+0Sg+Excl: nimikaagominaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl+Excl: gimikawiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg+Excl: gimikawiminaaban
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx+Excl: nimikaagosiinaabaneg
     mikaw+VTA+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx+Excl: nimikaagonaaban
